Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-958
Qualified mental health professional; provide medical treatment to subject; when.

Any qualified mental health professional, upon being authorized by the administrator of the facility or jail having custody of the subject, may provide appropriate medical treatment for the subject while in custody, except that a subject shall not be subjected to such quantities of medication or other treatment within such period of time prior to any hearing held under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act or, for a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964, a hearing held under the equivalent tribal law, as will substantially impair his or her ability to assist in his or her defense at such hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 72;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1062;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 78;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 49;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 119.

Mistreatment of mentally ill person, penalty, see section 83-356.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.